Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-1,102
Violations by agent or employee of licensee; deemed act of licensee, when.

Every act or omission of whatsoever nature constituting a violation of any of the provisions of the Nebraska Liquor Control Act by any officer, director, manager, or other agent or employee of any licensee, if such act is committed or omission is made with the authorization, knowledge, or approval of the licensee, shall be deemed and held to be the act of such employer or licensee, and such employer or licensee shall be punishable in the same manner as if such act or omission had been done or omitted by him or her personally.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 65, p. 410;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-365;

R.S.1943, § 53-1,102;

Laws 1994, LB 859, § 12.